Maryland, session 2026, HB0720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
18–604.
(a) For purposes of this section, an individual served in the Afghanistan or Iraq
conflict if the individual was an active service member who served in:
(1) Afghanistan or contiguous air space, as defined in federal regulations,
on or after October 24, 2001; or
(2) Iraq or contiguous waters or air space, as defined in federal regulations,
on or after March 19, 2003.
(b) There is a Douglas J. J. Peters Veterans of the Afghanistan and Iraq Conflicts
Scholarship.
(c) An individual may apply to the Office for a scholarship under this section if
the individual:
(1) Is a resident of Maryland;
– 1 –

Ch. 58 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (i) Is accepted for admission or enrolled in the regular
undergraduate program at an eligible institution; or
(ii) Is accepted for admission or enrolled in a 2–year terminal
certificate program in which the course work is acceptable for transfer credit for an
accredited baccalaureate program in an eligible institution; and
(3) (i) 1. Is a veteran who served in the Afghanistan or Iraq conflict;
2. Is an active service member who served in the Afghanistan
or Iraq conflict; or
3. Is a member of a reserve component who was activated as
a result of the Afghanistan or Iraq conflict described in subsection (a) of this section; or
(ii) Is a son, daughter, stepson, stepdaughter, or spouse of:
1. A veteran or an active service member who is serving or
has served in the Afghanistan or Iraq conflict; or
2. A member of the reserve component who was activated as
a result of the Afghanistan or Iraq conflict described in subsection (a) of this section.
(d) A scholarship awarded under this section may supplement, but is not
contingent on, any federal education benefits for which a recipient qualifies as a result of
an individual’s service or status as a dependent of an active service member or of a veteran.
(e) (1) Each scholarship may be used, at any eligible institution, to pay for
educational expenses as defined by the Office, including:
(i) Tuition and mandatory fees; and
(ii) Room and board.
(2) The annual amount of a scholarship may not exceed 50% of the
equivalent annual tuition, mandatory fees, and room and board of a resident
undergraduate student at the 4–year public institution of higher education within the
University System of Maryland, other than the University of Maryland Global Campus and
University of Maryland, Baltimore Campus, with the highest annual expenses for a
full–time resident undergraduate.
(f) A scholarship recipient shall maintain a grade point average of at least 2.5 on
a 4.0 scale.
(g) Each recipient of a scholarship under this section may hold the award for 5
years of full–time study or 8 years of part–time study.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 58
(h) (1) A scholarship recipient is not required to submit an application for
federal or State financial aid.
(2) Scholarship recipients who file for financial aid must file by March 1 of
each year.
[(i) (1) The Office may not award an initial scholarship to an individual after
June 30, 2030.
(2) The Office may renew a scholarship after June 30, 2030, if the
individual received an initial scholarship before that date.]
[(j)] (I) A Senator or Delegate may authorize the Office to award all or a portion
of the funds authorized under Subtitles 4 and 5 of this title to eligible recipients of
scholarships awarded under this section.
[(k)] (J) (1) Funds for the Douglas J. J. Peters Veterans of the Afghanistan
and Iraq Conflicts Scholarship shall be as provided in the annual budget of the Commission
by the Governor.
(2) (i) In this subsection, “Fund” means the Douglas J. J. Peters
Veterans of the Afghanistan and Iraq Conflicts Scholarship Fund.
(ii) There is a Douglas J. J. Peters Veterans of the Afghanistan and
Iraq Conflicts Scholarship Fund in the Commission.
(iii) The Commission shall administer the Fund.
(iv) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(v) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(vi) The Commission:
1. May accept any gift or grant from any person or
corporation for the Fund;
2. Shall use any gift or grant that it receives for a scholarship
from the Fund; and
3. Shall deposit any gift or grant that it receives for the Fund
with the State Treasurer.
– 3 –

Ch. 58 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (i) At the end of the fiscal year, the Commission shall prepare an
annual report on the Fund that includes an accounting of all financial receipts and
expenditures to and from the Fund.
(ii) The Commission shall submit a copy of the report to the General
Assembly as provided under § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 4 –